South Dakota, session 2026, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
There is created in the state treasury the residential tax reduction fund.
The Department of Revenue shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is
to provide property tax relief for owner-occupied single-family dwellings. Interest on
moneys credited to the fund must remain in the fund. Expenditures from the fund must
be budgeted through the general appropriation bill.
Section 2. That § 42-7A-38 be AMENDED:
42-7A-38. A video lottery machine may not allow more than two five dollars to be
played on a game or award free games or credits in excess of one thousand dollars per
bet. The payback value of one credit shall must be at least eighty percent of the value of
the credit.
Section 3. That § 42-7A-63 be AMENDED:
42-7A-63. The commission shall maximize revenues to the state from video
lottery. The state's percentage of net machine income shall be is fifty percent. The After
one-half of one percent of net machine income has been deposited into the video lottery
operating fund pursuant to § 42-7A-41.1, the state's percentage of net machine income
shall be directly must be deposited to the general fund, except for one-half of one percent
of net machine income authorized for deposit into the video lottery operating fund in an
amount up to one hundred sixty-five seventy-five million dollars in a year.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

226A 2 226
Moneys collected as the state's percentage of net machine income in excess of one
hundred sixty-five seventy-five million dollars in a year must be deposited into the
residential tax reduction fund established in section 1 of this Act.
The limitation set forth in this section on the amount deposited in the general fund
annually increases by three percent.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.